Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 348.205, as amended by section 15, chapter 95, Oregon Laws  2024, is amended
to read:
348.205. (1) The  Oregon Opportunity Grant program is established within the Higher Education
Coordinating Commission.
(2) Under the program, the [ cost of education of a qualified student  shall be shared by the student,
the family of the student, the federal  government and the state. ] commission shall award grants to
qualified students for the purpose of assisting  those students with the cost of education as
determined under subsection (3) or (4) of this section.
(3) The commission shall determine the cost of education of a qualified student based on the type
of eligible post-secondary institution the student is attending. The cost of education equals:
(a) For a student attending a community college, the  average cost of education of attending a
community college in this state;
(b) For a student attending a public university  listed in ORS 352.002, the average cost of edu-
cation of attending a public university;
(c) For a student attending a two-year Oregon-based, generally  accredited, not-for-profit institu-
tion of higher education,  the average cost of education of attending a community college in this
state; and
(d) For a student attending the Oregon Health and Science University or a  four-year Oregon-
based, generally accredited, not-for-profit institution of higher education,  the average cost of edu-
cation of attending a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
[(4)(a)] (4) The  commission may determine the cost of education of a qualified student
enrolled at an eligible post-secondary institution in an eligible program  that does not lead to
a degree.
(5) The commission  shall determine the amount of [ the student share. The student share shall
be] a grant awarded under this section  based on:
[(A)] (a) The type of eligible post-secondary institution the student is attending;
[(B) The number  of hours of work that the commission determines may be reasonably expected from
the student; and ]
[(C) The amount of loans that the commission determines would constitute a  manageable debt
burden for the student. ]
Enrolled House Bill 3025 (HB 3025-A) Page 1
[(b) The  student shall determine how to cover the student share through income from work, loans,
savings and scholarships. ]
[(c) The student share for a student who attends a community college may not  exceed the amount
that the commission determines a student may earn based on the number of hours  of work reasonably
expected from the student under paragraph (a) of this subsection. ]
[(d) The student share for a student who attends an eligible post-secondary institution that is not
a community college  may not exceed the sum of the amount that the commission determines a student
may receive as loans plus the amount a student may  earn based on the number of hours of work rea-
sonably expected from the student under paragraph (a) of this subsection. ]
[(5) The commission shall determine the amount of the family share.  The family share shall be
based on the resources of the family. ]
[(6) The commission shall determine the amount of the federal share based on how much the stu-
dent or the student’s family is expected to receive from the federal government. ]
[(7)(a) The commission shall determine  the amount of the state share by rule. The state share shall
be equal to the cost of education reduced  by the student share, family share and amount received by
the student from the federal government. ]
[(b) The commission shall establish a minimum amount that a  student may receive as a state share.
If the commission determines that the amount of the state share of  a student is below the minimum
amount, the student may not receive the state share. ]
[(c)] (b) The enrollment level of the student;
(c) An analysis of the student’s financial need; and
(d) Any other  factor the commission deems necessary and appropriate to determine the
amount of the grant.
(6) The commission may not reduce [ the amount of the state share of ] a grant awarded  to a
student based on  amounts available to the student by virtue of being the designated beneficiary of
a college savings network account established under ORS 178.300 to 178.360.
[(8)] (7) Subject to subsection [ (9)] (8) of this section, if the commission  determines that there
are insufficient moneys to [ award the state share ] award grants to all qualified students, the  com-
mission:
[(a) May establish the maximum amount that a student may receive as a state share. This amount
may vary based on whether the student is  attending an eligible post-secondary institution on a half-time
or full-time basis. ]
[(b)] (a) May establish procedures that prioritize  awarding Oregon Opportunity Grants to qual-
ified students with the greatest financial need or  whose circumstances would enhance the promotion
of equity guidelines published by the commission.
[(c)] (b) May not reduce the amount of [ the state share awarded ] grants awarded to students
[in the low income range ] with greater financial need, as determined by the  commission, in a
greater proportion than  the amount [ that the state share for ] of grants awarded to students [in other
income ranges is ] with less financial need is  reduced.
[(9)] (8) The commission shall  adopt rules that implement the Oregon Opportunity Grant pro-
gram. The rules adopted by the commission shall:
(a) Specify the manner by which  the commission determines [ the state share ] the amount of
grants awarded to qualified students .
(b) Prioritize current foster  children and former foster children for receiving Oregon Opportu-
nity Grants when the Oregon  Opportunity Grant program does not have sufficient funding to serve
all eligible Oregon students. As  used in this paragraph, “former foster child” has the meaning given
that term in ORS 350.300.
(c) Determine  how the commission shall award qualified students in eligible programs
that do not lead to a degree. Rules adopted under this  paragraph must define which pro-
grams or types of programs that do not lead to a  degree are eligible, and must determine the
methods the commission shall use to calculate award amounts for  both credit and noncredit
programs made eligible by the commission.
Enrolled House Bill 3025 (HB 3025-A) Page 2
SECTION 2.  ORS 348.260, as amended by section 17, chapter 95, Oregon Laws  2024, is amended
to read:
348.260. (1) In addition to any other form of student financial aid  authorized by law, the Higher
Education Coordinating Commission may award Oregon Opportunity Grants to qualified students.
(2) The amount of a grant shall equal the [ state share of a qualified student’s cost of  education ]
amount of  a grant  as determined by the commission under ORS 348.205 and comply with appli-
cable rules and procedures described in ORS 348.205.
(3) Grant  funds necessary to meet matching requirements for federal funds may also be used to
award grants  to qualified students in any eligible post-secondary institution approved by the com-
mission.
(4) Grants may be awarded under this section to  qualified students enrolled for any term, in-
cluding summer term. The commission may prescribe the method and date or dates by  which a stu-
dent must apply to the commission to qualify for a grant.
(5)(a) A qualified student  who receives a grant under this section may apply for renewal of the
grant on an annual basis. The commission may not renew the grant if the qualified student has  not
made a timely application for renewal of the grant.
(b) The commission shall by rule establish academic standards and benchmarks  that a qualified
student must meet to have the student’s grant renewed.
(c) If a qualified student who receives a grant  under this section makes a timely application for
renewal of  the grant, meets the academic standards and benchmarks established by the commission
under this subsection and continues to meet all other grant eligibility criteria, the grant  shall be
renewed for a second year of attendance at an eligible post-secondary institution.
(d) Upon timely application by a qualified student who meets the  academic standards and
benchmarks established by the commission under this subsection and who  continues to meet all
other grant eligibility criteria, the commission may continue to renew the  grant until the qualified
student has received the  equivalent of four full-time undergraduate years of grant funding for an
eligible program as defined by the commission.
(6)(a) The commission shall inform eligible post-secondary institutions of  the identity of qualified
students who attend the institution and who  receive a grant under this section for more than one
academic  year.
(b) To the extent possible, eligible post-secondary  institutions shall ensure that qualified stu-
dents identified under this subsection  are made aware of the academic guidance and counseling
services available at the institution.
(7) A qualified student who receives a grant  under this section must attend the eligible post-
secondary institution upon which the  grant application is based unless the commission authorizes
the grant to be used at a different eligible post-secondary institution. A qualified student  who re-
ceives a grant under this section may attend more than one eligible post-secondary institution if  the
grant application was based  on the qualified student attending more than one eligible post-secondary
institution.
(8) The commission  may not [ make a grant award ] award a grant  to any qualified student en-
rolled in a course of study required for and leading to a degree  in theology, divinity or religious
education.
(9)(a) The commission shall report annually on or before February 1 to committees of the  Leg-
islative Assembly related to higher education regarding the academic  success and performance of
qualified students who receive grants under this section.
(b) In order to meet the reporting requirements set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection:
(A) The commission shall by rule design a method  for evaluating the academic success and
performance of students who receive a grant under this section; and
(B) Upon a request from the commission, eligible post-secondary institutions must  provide the
commission with the data necessary for the commission to conduct its analysis.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 348.263, as amended by section 18, chapter 95, Oregon Laws  2024, is amended
to read:
Enrolled House Bill 3025 (HB 3025-A) Page 3
348.263. (1) In addition to any other form of student financial aid  authorized by law, the Higher
Education Coordinating Commission may award moneys  from the Oregon Opportunity Grant pro-
gram to qualified students  to reward student persistence and encourage completion of degree pro-
grams at eligible post-secondary institutions.
(2) Awards made under this section are not subject to the maximum Oregon Opportunity Grant
amount established under ORS 348.205.
(3) The commission shall establish  by rule eligibility criteria for awards made under this section.
[These] The criteria shall include[ , but  not be limited to, whether the qualified student is attending
an eligible post-secondary institution on a full-time or half-time  basis ] the enrollment level of the
student.
(4)(a) The commission shall administer, and determine the  [size] amount of, awards made under
this section.
(b) In determining the [ size] amount of awards made under  this section, the commission shall
consider  basing  the [ size] amount  of the awards on a percentage of the maximum Oregon Oppor-
tunity Grant amount established under ORS 348.205.
SECTION 4.  ORS 348.180 is amended to read:
348.180. As used in this section and ORS 348.205, 348.250, 348.260 and 348.263:
(1) “Cost of education” includes but is not limited to, tuition, fees and living expenses.
(2) “Eligible post-secondary institution” means:
(a) A public university listed in ORS 352.002;
(b) A community college operated under ORS chapter 341;
(c) The Oregon Health and Science University; or
(d) An Oregon-based, generally accredited, not-for-profit institution of higher education.
(3) “Enrollment level” means  the course load taken by a student as a proportion of the
expected full-time course load.
[(3)] (4) “Qualified student” means any [ resident] student[ , or student exempted  from paying non-
resident tuition under  ORS 352.287, who plans to attend ] who has been a resident of this state for
not less than 12 months prior to enrolling at  an eligible post-secondary institution and who:
(a) Has not achieved a baccalaureate or higher degree from any post-secondary institution;
(b) Is enrolled  in an eligible program as defined by rule of the Higher Education Coordinating
Commission; [ and]
(c) Is making satisfactory academic progress as defined by rule of the commission ; and
(d) Has not been admitted to the  United States for the purpose of enrolling in a program
of study at an institution of higher education .
SECTION 5.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the amendments to
ORS 348.180, 348.205, 348.260 and 348.263  by sections 1 to 4 of this 2025 Act first apply to the
2026-2027 academic year.
(2) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission may delay implementation of  awards
to qualified students in eligible programs that do not lead to a degree until the 2027-2028
academic year if the commission  determines additional time is required to ensure proper
implementation or to ensure such awards are issued in a manner that aligns with  federal
government initiatives to award such students.
Enrolled House Bill 3025 (HB 3025-A) Page 4
Passed by House March 31, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 12, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3025 (HB 3025-A) Page 5